Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1230YC (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 422.7, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. a. Add Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , add any 3 federal net operating loss deduction carried over from a 4 taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 2023. 5 b. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, 6 but before January 1, 2023, subtract, to the extent included, 7 the amount the taxpayerâs federal adjusted gross income was 8 increased during the applicable tax year by reason of the 9 application of section 461(l) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 11 retroactively to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 12 2021, but before January 1, 2023. 13